examples/patterns/hyph-de-1901-joint.pat.txt
uan2g
ua2p
ua3pl
uapo2
uar3e
uar3s
uat2
uat3h
ua3tin
u3au
u1äm
u1äu
2ub
u2bab
u8becken.
u1be2e
u1beg
ub3ein
u1bem
uben3so
ub2er
u3berat
ub2es
ube2to
u1bez
ub3g
ubi2l
ub1läu
ub1lu
ub3lun
ub1rit
ub2rü
ub2san
ub2so
ub2s1pa
ubst4
ub2s3z
u1bus
u2büb
ub3z
4u2c
uce2
uch1a
uch4arm
uch1ä
uch1ec
uch1ei
u3chem
uche4r
uch1i
uch1l
uch3m
uch3n
uch1o
uch1r
ucht3re
uch3ü
uch1w
uck3erl
uck4err
uck1l
u3cl
2ud2
ude1e
ude4l
uden3s
uden4te
u1de2p
uder2e
u1dez
udge4
ud3h
u1dia.
u2do
ud3on
ud3ra
u3dru
2ue
ued2
ueen4
u1ef
ue1g
u1ei
uel2l
uel1t
ue2m
u1emi
ue2n
uen3a
uenge4
uen2gl
uen3k
ue2r
uer5a
uer1ä
uer3b
u3erbau
uer6baut
uer3g2
u3erhal
uerin3f
uer3m
u3er4nan
uern3st
uer1o
u1er2ö
u1erri
uers2k
uert2
uer3tei
uer1th
uer3v
uer3z
u1eta
ue2te
u1ex
uf1ab
u3fah
uf1ak
u3fal
uf3ar
uf1au
uf1äs
uf1äß
4ufe.
uf1ei
uf1em
u3fenst
ufe3rat
uf1erh
uf1eß
2uff
uffel2
u3fic
uf3l
u1flä
uf3n
uf1ori
uf1r
uf4so
uf2spo
ufs3ter
uf1tel
uf1ti
uft3s2
uf1tu
uf3z
2ug
uga4
u4gabte
ug1af
ug1ak
ug1ap
u2g1ar
ug1au
ug1d2
u3gef
u3geh
u2g3ei
ugen3g
u2gens
ug3ent
u3gep
ug3erf
uge3rie
ug3erl
ug3f
ug3hu
u2g1la
u2g1lä
u2g3lo
u1g2lö
u2glu
u2gn
ugo3
ug1or
u4g3reis
ug3ro
u2grol
ug3rüs
ug3se
ug3si
ug3spa
ug4spr
ug4spu
ugs3t
ug3str
ug3stu
ug3s4tü
u1gui
u2gum
u1ha
uh2au
u1hä
uhe1h
uhelm1
uhe3ma
uher2
uhe3ra
uhe1s
uhi2
uh1la
uh1lä
uh2le
uh3ma
u1ho
u3hö
uhr1a
uhr3er
uh1ri
uh2r1o
uhr1t
uh1s2
u1hü
uh1w
2ui
uil2
uin1g
ui3no
uir4
ui4s
ui1v
u1j
u1k2a
uk2e
u1ki
uk2k
uk2l
u1kla
uk2n
uk2ö
ukt1r
u1ku
uk2ü
ul1am
ul1äm
ulb2
ul1c
uld3a
ul2dr
uld4se
2ule
u3lei
ul1el
ul1er4h
ules3t
ul1eta
ul3fe
ulg2
u3lic
ulik3
ul1ins
ul1ke
ul3ko
ul1la
ull1ac
ull2m
ull3s
ul1n
u1lo2
ul1or
u3l2ö
ul3pe
ul4p1h
ul3su
ul2t
4ult2a
ult3ar
ulte2
ul3th
ul3to
ult3s
ul1z2
u2m1ak
um1all
u2mam
uman3g
u2m1art
u2m1äh
umär4
um1ärg
um3b
um2bo
um1d2
u1mec
u3mei
u3meli
um1em
ument4s
umer2a
um1erf
um1erg
um1erl
um1erw
1umf
1umg
um1inh
u2m1ins
um1ir
1umk
1um3l
2umm
umm2a
um2mi
um2mu
um3n
umo2
u3mol
u3mon
umpf4li
um2ph
1umr
2ums.
2umsab
um4san
3umsat
ums1er
2umsf
um2sim
2umsk
um2s1pe
ums5tag
umt2
um1th
um3um
um2un
u2m1ur
1umz
3umzug
u2n
2un.
1u4nab
un2abr
u3n1ac
un3an1
un1ap
un3at
u3n1ä
un1c
1unda
1undd
und3erf
1undf
2undg
und3l
1undn
2un2d1r
und3s
4unds.
und1t
und1um
1undv
1undz
un1e
u3neb
un3ein
un3eis
uner3g
un2es
u3net
unf2
un3fa
unft4s
2ung
4ung.
un3gef
3un3get
3ungew
un1gl
3unglü
ungs3
ung4sa
u3nic
un2id
un3ide
1unif
un3isl
uni1so
3u4niv
2unk
unk1a
unk1n
unkom1
unk3s2
unk4ti
unn1ad
unn2e
1unr
uns2
un3se
un4sere
1un5si
un3sk
un3sp
uns4t
2unsy
2unsz
1unt
un1ta
2unth
2un1ti
2un1to
unt4r
unt3s
2un1u
u3num
u3nut
u3nü
unvoll3
1unw
2unwä
un1zie
u1ob
u3of3
u1or
uor1c
uor1e
uor2g
u1pa
upar4
upen1
uper3
up2fa
upf2e
u2pf1i
u1ph
u2pho
u3phon
u4plet
u3po
up2p
u1pr
upra1
2upt
upt3a
upt3erf
upt3erg
upt1o
u1pu
u1q
2ur.
u1rad
u1rah
ur1alt
ur1am
ur3amt
ur2an.
ur1ana
uran4fa
uran4fo
ur1ang
uran4ge
ur2anh
ur1ans
ur3ar4
ur3att
ur1au
ur3auf
4u1rä
ur1än
ur2bi
ur2bo1
urch1i
urd2
ur3da
2ure
u1rea
ure5b
u1rec
u1red
ure1e
u1ref
ur1eff
u1rei
u1rek
ur1e4p
ur1erw
ure4t
ur1eta
2urf
urf1li
urf4spr
ur3ga
ur2gi
urgs4
ur3h
ur1im
uri3mu
ur2inf
ur1ini
urin8stin
urk2
ur2ke
ur3kel
ur3kl
urko2
ur3l
ur4mäh
urme4
ur1men2
ur3mi
ur2n
ur3nat
ur3nä
urn2e
ur3no
2uro
uro3b
uro1c
uro1d
uro1g
uro3m
uro1n
ur3or
ur2os
ur3p
ur4pu
2urr
urre1c
ur3sac
ur3sal
ur3son
ur4spa
urst4r
ur4sw
ur1t2
ur3th
urts1t
u1ruc
u1rui
ur3ur
ur3va
u3ryt
ur2z
urz1a
ur3zen
urz1o
urz1w
2us
usa2
us3art
us3chec
u3schei
usch3mü
u4schun
usch5wer
us1ec
u1see
us1ei
u3seid
usen2d
use1ra
us1erk
us1erl
us1ers
us1erw
us1ese
usi4
u3sie
u3sim
u3sit
us2ke
u4s3ko
u4sl
us5le
us3m
us1o
u1so.
us3oc
u3sov
us3part
us1pas
us1pat
u3spek
us1pen
us1pic
us2por
us1pu
uss3an
us1seg
us5sende
uss5erfa
usser6kl
uss5er6su
us1so
ussof3
uss3tab
uss3tät
uss3tor
ust3abe
u3stal
us1tar
us1tas
us1tau
us4tä
us4te
u3stel
usten3t
us4th
us3tor
us4tras
u3stu
us1tur
u3s4tüc
u3sum
u2sü
u3sy
u4s3z
2uß
ußen1
uße3s
ußof3
uß1u
2ut
ut1alt
ut2am
ut1ap
ut1ar
ut1är
u1tät
ut1ed
ut1ege
ute3gi
ute3gr
u1tei
ut1ei.
ut1eie
u4tem
u4ten
uten2a
uten1e
u1teue
ut1ex3
uti2
u1tit
ut3ne
u2to1
uto3c
uto3m
utop2
ut1opf
utor2a
u1tö
u2töl
u3tras
ut2s
ut3s2a
ut4säu
ut3se
ut4sh
ut3s2i
uts2ka
ut3so
ut3sp
ut4spa
ut3st
ut1ta
utt4an
ut4to3
utts2
ut1tu
ut2z
utz3eng
utz1in
utz1w
2uu
u1uf
uum1
u1uni
u1ü
u1v
u1w
u5wa
u3wä
ux2e
uxt2
uy1
u1z
u3zei
u2zen
u2zer
u2zes
uzin2
u3zo
uz1ot
u3zu
u3zü
uz1we
uzz2
1ü4b
üb1ä
2übc
2üb2d
übe2
über3
üb1l
üb1ro
3übu
2üc
üch1l
üch2s
üchs1c
üch2t
ücht4e
ück1er
ücker6ke
ück4spe
ü2d
üd3a4
üden2
üd3m
üd1o4
üd1r
üd3s2
üd1t2
üe4
ü2f
üf1a
üf1ei
üfer2
üf1erg
üf2f
üf3i
üfin3
üf1l
üft2l
ü2g
üge1g
üge2l
ügel1e
üg2g
üg1l
ü3gr
üg3s
üg4st
üh1a
üh3b
üh1ei
üh1eng
üh1er
üher2z
üh1i
üh1lä
ühl2e
üh1li
ühmen2
üh1mi
üh3mo
ühn4e
ühn2s
üh1o
ühr2e
üh1rei
ühr3ei.
üh3rent
üh3ro
ühr3ta
üh1s4
üh3temp
üh3tr
üh3w
ü1k
ül1a
ül2e
ül1k
ül2l
üll1au
ül2p
ül2s
ül2v
üme4
üm2m
ü2n2
ün3a
ünd3l
ün3do
ünd3s
ün3ei
ünen1
ünf1a
ünf1ei
ün3fl
üng1l
ün3gü
ün3ker
ün3ko
ün3se
üns2l
ün3sp
ün3str
ün3tee
ün3zo
üp2
üpel1
üpf3l
ü1pu
ü2r2
ür3a
ür3ei
ür3fl
ür4fr
ürg3eng
ür3gr
ür3h
ür4ke
ür6ki
ür3kl
ür3na
üro3
ür3ö
ür3ra
ür3ri
ür3sc
ür3se
ür3si
ür3so
ürt2
ür3v
ür3za
ü2s4
üse3l
üsen3
üse1s
ü3sp
üss1c
üss2e
üt1a
üte1d
üte3g
üte1m
üte4n
üten3t2
üter4l
üt1r
üt2s3
üt2t
üt2z
ü1v
v1ab
1vag
vak4
val2e
val4s
va3ma
van2c
2v1ang
vas2
va3sc
va3st
v4at
vat3a
vat3h
vatik2
vat3m
vat1r
vat3s4
vat1u
vat3z
v1au
v1b
v1d
ve2
2ve.
2vea
ve3ar
veau3s
2ve3b
ve3c
2vef
ve3gr
veil2
v1ein
veit4
veits3
2vel
ve3lan
ve3le
ve4lo
4vem2
ve3ma
ve3mu
4ven.
4vend
ven4erg
ven3k
1venö
ven2t
2veo2
ve3of
2vep
ver1
4ver.
3ver3a4
ve3rad
verb2l
verd2
veren2
verf2
verg2
ver3m
vern2
ver3r
ver3u
ver3v
ve3sa
ve3sc
ve3se
ves4t2
ve3ta
veter2
ve3tr
2vev
2vew
v1f2
v1g
v1h
vi2
2vi.
2vic
vid3st
vie2
3view
2vii
3vik2
v2il
vil1a
vil1eh
vil3in3
v1im
vin2
v1int
vinz3l
3vio
3vir
vis2
vize3
2v1k
2v1l2
v1m
1vo2
4vo.
4vo3a
4v1ob
vo3bl
vo3br
vog2
voge2
vo4ka
3vol
vo3len
voll3au
voll5end
voller4
4vo3m
v1op
vor3
vormen4
vot1t
3vög
völ2
2vös
v1p
2vr2
v1ra
v1re
v1ro
4vs
v1s2e
v1si
v1so
v1sta
v1su
v1s2z
4vt
v1ta
v1tä
v1to
v1tö
vue1
vul2
v1ur
v1v
v1w
vy1
v1z
w2a2
1waa
wab2
wa3ba
wach4t4r
3waf
4wafe
3wag
1wah
2wa4k
waki4
1wal
2walb
wal2c
wal2l
2walm
wal2s
wal3st
wal2t
walt3a
wal3tr
walt4st
3wal2z
wan2
w3an3f
2wang
wang4s
1wann
wan3se
wanz5end
wa4r
war4b
1war4e
ware1i
3wareke
waren1
war4n
war4z
3was
wasch3l
wass4
wasse2
wä2
1wäh
1wäl
2wäng
wär6
1wäs
w1b
w2boy
2w1c
we4
2we.
web1a
4webeb
web1l
web3s
wee2
weed3
1weg
weg1a
weg3ers
weg1l
weg1n
weg3r
weg3s
wegs4t
1weh
weh1l
weh1m
2weie
wei2er
weik2
3weil
wei3m
wein4s3a
wei3sc
weis4s3p
wei3str
wei2tr
wel2
wel3b
wel4t1
welt3a
welt5end
wem2
we5me
we5mo
wen3a
wen2g
wen3ge
wenk3ri
wer2
wer3a
1wer4bu
werd2
5werdens
1werdu
werer2
2werg
werg1o
wer3i
1werk.
1werke
wer3ni
wer3r
wert1a
wert3ei
wert5erm
wert1o
wert3ri
1wese2
wesens3
west1a
west3ei
west1o
west1r
1wet
2wets
wett3s
4we5u
4we5v
w1g
w3h
w2i4
1wid2
2wieb
wie1m
wien2e
2wier
wie4st
2wig
wig4s
1wil
wil2d
wil4h
wim4
win4
wind3ec
2wing
4wini
winn7er8sc
1wir
wis2
1wiss
wit2
4witzd
w1k
2w1m
wn3
wo2a
1woc
3woh4
wo1he
wohl1
1wolf
wolf2s3
won2
wor2
wort1r
wo3si
1wöc
wöl4
wör2
wört2h
2w1p
1wr
w1ro
2ws
w3s2h
w3sk
ws1s
wsser4
w1sti
2wt
w1ta
w1term
w1ti
w1tons
w2u2
1wuc
wuch2
wuls2
wun2
wung3r
wur2
4wur.
wur4f
wur3g
wur4m
1wurst
wur4z
wus2
1wut3
1wü
2wül
wür4
2ww
2w1z
x1a
xa4br
x2a3d
xaf2
xa1fl
x2a3g2
x3ann
x2ant4
x2anz
x1b
x1ce
x1ch
x1cl
x1d
xe2
x1eg
x1ele
x1em
x2en
xen1k
xen3s2
xen3t
x1er2
xer3a
x2ere
xer3s2
x3eu
x1f
x1g
x1h
xi2
xi3c
xich2
xide2
xid1em
xi3di
x1ido
xi3f
xi3g
xil3
xi3le
xim2
xin3s2
xio2
xi3p
xi3r
xi3sc
xi4s1e
xis1s
xis4tä
x1itu
xi3u
xi3ze
x1j
x1k
xkal2
xl2
x1lä
x1le
x1m
x1n2
xo2d
x1oe
xo2p
xo3pl
x1or2
x1ö
x1p
x3pe
x3pr
x1q
x1r
x3s2
x2t
xt1a
xt2ant
xt1ä
x3tät
xt1ed
xt1ei
xter4
xt1erf
xt1ev
xti2
xtil4l
xt1in
x3to
xtra3b2
x4trag
x3trak
xt1ran
xtra3t
x4tre
xt1re1c
x3tru
xt1s2
xt1t
xt1um
xt1un
xt3w
xt1z
xu2
xual1l
x1un
xus3
x1ve
x1w
xy1r
xy1t
x1z
ya2
y1ab
y1am
yan2g
y1ar
y1ä
y1b
y3bo
yc2
ycon2
y2d2
y3di
y3do
ydro1
ydro3m
y1ed
y1ei
y2e2l
y1en
yes2
y1est
y1et
y3f2
y1g2
y1h
y3ho
yhr2
y1i
yin2
yk2
y1ki
ykot2
y1ku
yl1am
yl4ante
y1lau
yl1c
yl1d
yl1es
yl2l
yl3la
y2lo
ylo1g
yl3p
yl3s
yl2va
y3ma
ym1m
ym2n
y1mu
yn1
yn2a
ynt2
y1n2u
yo3k
yo1p
y1ou
y2p
y3pa
yp3ab
yp1an
y3pä
yp2e
ypen3
yper1t
yp1f
y3pho
ypi2
yp1id
yp1in
yp1l
y4po3
y3pr
yp1te
yp1th
yp1um
yr2
y1rau
y1rä
y1rei
yro3
yrr4
y2sa
yse1
ys4e2r
y3s4h
y4sl
y3s4pa
yst4e
yst2h
y1sty
ys1u
y1s2z
yt2
yt3g
yt3l
yto1s
y1tu
y3u
y1v
y3w
y1z2
y2za
1za
2za.
2z3ab
z1achs
2z1ad
2z1af2
3z2ah
2z3ak
2z1al
z2ali
2z1am
z1an
2z3anf
2z3angs
3z2an2k
z3anl
2z3anr
z1ar
2zarm
2zarti
2z1as2
za3st2
2z3at4
zau2
3zaub
z1auf
z3aug
3zaun
2za1v
1zä
z1äc
3z2äh
zä1he
2z1äm
2zängs
z1ärg
z1ärm
4z3b2
zbe1
zbe2i
zbe2to
2z3c
2z3d2
zdar3
zde2
6ze.
2ze1b
z1eben
ze2d
ze3di
ze1e
2zef
z1eff
2ze1g
3zehe
zehen1
3zehnm
1zei
zei1b
zei1d
2zeie
zei2g
zei1k2
zeil2
zei3m
4z1ein
z2e1ind
ze3inse
zei1r
zei3s4
zeist2
z2ei2t
zeit1a
zeit5end
zeit3er
zeit3ri
zei1z
ze2l
zel1a
zel1d
zel1e4
ze3lei
zel3f
zel3i
zel2la
zel3lau
3zeller
3zellig
2zel3s2
ze4lu
4zelw
2zem2
ze1mi
4z1emp
ze4n
4zen.
2zena
zen1ac
2zend
4zene
4zeng
zen1k
zen1n
zens2e
zen3so
zen5str
zent1a
z2entr
zent3s
4zenz
zenz3er
ze2ph
ze2pi
2zepl
2zer.
zer3a
zer3d
ze1rek
2zerg
z1ergä
z3ergeb
z3erhal
2zerk2
z1erlö
zer3m
zer2ne
zern3ei
2z1erq
z4err
zer2ru
z1ersa
zers4t
z3erste
zert1a
zert3ag
zert4an
zert5rau
2zerw
z1erz
z2e2s
ze3sc
zes1e
2zesk
ze3sku
zes2s
zess5end
3zessiv
zess3t
zes3t
ze3sta
zeß1
1zet
2zeta
ze1ti
2zett.
2zetts
1zeu2
z1ex
2zez
2z3f4
zfe2
4z1g2
zge2ni
zger2a
z4gerei
zge1ri
z2germ
zger2s1
zgie4
2z1h
zher2
zi2
zia2
2zi3b
1zic
zick1
zide2
zi1di
zid1r
zie2
1zieh
1ziel.
2zien
zien4s
2zierk
zi3go
zi3h
zil4
zi3la
1zim
zi3me
3z2imm
2z1imp
zim2t3
2z1ind
4z1inf
zin2g
zin1ge
z1inh
zin2s
zin3sc
4zinsuf
4zint
z1inv
zi4o
zio1d
1zir
zi3re
zirk2
zirk6s
zis4
zi3sz
zit2h
zit1o
zit2t
2ziu
ziv2
zi3ve
zi3z
z1j
4z1k2
zkom1
2z1l2
z3leb
z3led
z3leh
z3leis
z2li.
z2lip
z2lu
z2ly
4z1m2
2z1n4
znach4b
z2ne
znei3
z3nel
z3neu
1zo
2zoa
z1ob
2zo1d
2z1of
zof3f
zo2g
4zogenb
4zogenr
2zogi
2zogl
2zogsm
2zogsw
2zogtu
2zogtü
2z1oh
2zo3k
2zol.
2zom
zonal2
zont1
zo2o
zoo3f
zoo3t
2zop
z1ope
zo3pi
z1or2
2zo1s2
1zög
z1öl
2zön
2z1p2
zpol4
z1q
2z1r2
zro2
2z1s2
z3sa
z3sh
z3sk
4zt
z1ta2
z2t1au
z1tä
z3tee
zte3g
z1tei
z1temp
zte3o
z1term
z1teu
z2thei
z1ther
zt3ho
z2tin
z1to4
z1tö
zt1rec
zt2ru
zt3s2
zt1t
z1tu
z1tü
zt1z
1zu1
zu3a
3zu3b2
5zuc
zuch2
zuck4
zu3d4
zude2
3zuf4
3zug
zugs1
zug3un
z1uhr
3zuk
3zul
3zum
4z1um.
zumen2
zu3mo
4zumr
z1ums
2zun2
zu3na
3zu3ne
3zunf
zung4
zu3ni
zu3nu
zup2
zur4a
zu3re
2z1urk
2z1url
z1urs
z1urt
3zu3s4
zusch4
3zu3t4
zu3u
3zuw
zuz2
1zü
2züb
3züg
3zün
2z1v
1zw2
z1wac
2zwag
2zwal
zwand1
z1war
2zweg
2zweh
2z1wel
2z1wen2
z1wer4
2z1wes
z2wic
zwie1g
z2wit
2z1wo
z1wör
z1wur
2zwü
3zy
4zylb
4zyle
4zym
2z1z
zz4a
z3zei
z3zet
zzi3s
zz2o
zz2ö
z3zu
zzug4
z3zw
